Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.016

Reserved name.

(1) Reserved Name—Domestic Limited Liability Company. A person may reserve the exclusive use of a limited liability company name by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with RCW 23.95.310.

(2) Reserved Name—Foreign Limited Liability Company. A foreign limited liability company may reserve its name by delivering to the secretary of state for filing an application in accordance with RCW 23.95.315.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7102; 2015 c 188 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.